District of Columbia statutes.
4-261.02

Categorical eligibility for food stamps.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish a TANF funded program or service for the purpose of establishing categorical eligibility.

(b)

Categorical eligibility shall be granted to all applicants with a gross income at or below 200% of the federal poverty level.

History

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5082, 57 DCR 181

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5082 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5082 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).